Utah statutes.
72-10-601.   Definitions.
As used in this part:
(1)  "City" means a municipality of the first class, as defined under Section
10-2-301, that:
(a)  is authorized by statute to operate an airport; and
(b)  operates an airport with greater than 10 million annual passengers.
(2)  "Division" means the Criminal Investigation and Technical Services
Division of the Department of Public Safety, established in Section 53-10-103.
(3)  "Ground transportation service" means transporting passengers for hire or
as a courtesy in connection with a business over public streets pursuant to a
license with the city.
(4) (a)  "Ground transportation service provider" means a driver who provides
ground transportation service where the pickup or drop-off of a passenger
occurs at an airport under a city's authority.
(b)  "Ground transportation service provider" includes:
(i)  a taxicab driver;
(ii)  a limousine or luxury car driver;
(iii)  a bus or minibus driver, except a driver of a transit vehicle, as
defined in Section 17B-2a-802;
(iv)  a courtesy vehicle or hotel vehicle driver;
(v)  a special transportation vehicle driver who transports disabled persons;
and
(vi)  a van driver.
